Massachusetts, session 194th, H2706.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The executive office of education and the executive office of administration and finance,
in consultation with the department of correction, shall conduct a comprehensive assessment of
the status of the delivery of postsecondary education programs in correctional facilities for the
purpose of expanding the high-quality provision of such. This assessment shall include, but need
not be limited to:
(a) the current provision of postsecondary education programs (degree and non-degree,
for- and non-credit), enrollments, Pell Grant utilization, completions, and equity measures
related thereto, (b) a determination of the level of unmet demand for postsecondary education
among incarcerated persons, informed by facility populations, educational assessment data, and
other indicators of current and potential readiness for program participation, (c) a needs
assessment of the facilities, materials and staffing required for expanding the delivery of high-
quality, workforce-aligned postsecondary education programs in correctional facilities in line
of 3

with potential demand, including an inventory of the correctional facilities, including, but not
limited to, classrooms, multipurpose rooms, libraries and study rooms, staffing, and materials
and learning infrastructure, including, but not limited to, education technology and internet
access that is currently available for the delivery of postsecondary education, (d)
recommendations for and a cost analysis of the improvement of such programs, facilities,
staffing, materials, and infrastructure to meet the unmet demand for postsecondary education and
support program innovation and expansion, (e) an analysis of the policies of the department of
correction impacting the postsecondary education of incarcerated persons, including, but not
limited to: (i) classification regulations and processes, (ii) facility transfer policies and practices,
(iii) data systems and reporting, (iv) a listing of any other specific barriers to the effective
delivery of postsecondary education programs to incarcerated persons, and (v) a survey of (1)
students of postsecondary education programs in correctional facilities, (2) former students of
such programs, conducted in consultation with regional reentry programs, and (3) any group or
person the division deems necessary, and (f) a solicitation of feedback from institutions of higher
education that provide postsecondary education programs in correctional facilities to understand
current needs, program delivery costs, credit transferability, and other issues impacting program
access and completion, (g) a survey of other state agencies regarding staff, programs, policies,
resources, and funding relevant to expanding delivery of postsecondary education programs in
corrections facilities the results of which would serve to generate: (i) recommendations for
establishing ongoing inter-agency planning and cooperation to expand and support the delivery
and completion of postsecondary education programs during and after incarceration (including
efforts related to developing processes for timely access to the transcripts and academic records
incarcerated individuals need to enter collegiate coursework), (ii) recommendations for
of 3

increasing access for corrections staff to professional development and postsecondary education
programs, (iii) recommendations for a process of regular executive and legislative review of
progress toward expanding program delivery and completion of postsecondary education.
The survey will target an array of relevant agencies including, but not limited to: the
executive office of education, the department of elementary and secondary education, the
department of higher education, the office of student financial assistance, the department of labor
and workforce development, commonwealth corporation, the executive office of health and
human services, the executive office of veterans services, division of capital asset management
and maintenance, and the executive office of housing and livable communities.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2026, the secretary of administration and finance shall issue
a report regarding the needs assessment conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. The
report shall be submitted to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate.
of 3